en: Brewing water
cs: Pivovarská voda
de: Brauwasser
fr: Eau de brassage
hr: pivovarska voda
it: acqua per infusione

en: spring water
bg: изворна вода
da: kildevand
de: Quellwasser
es: Agua de manantial
fi: lähdevesi
fr: eau de source
hr: izvorska voda
hu: forrásvíz
it: acqua di fonte
nl: bronwater
pl: woda źródlana
pt: Água de nascente
sv: källvatten
tr: kaynak suyu

en: natural spring water
bg: натурална изворна вода
da: naturligt kildevand
de: natürliches Quellwasser
es: agua de manantial natural
fi: luontainen lähdevesi
fr: eau de source naturelle
hr: prirodna izvorska voda
it: acqua di sorgente naturale
nl: natuurlijk bronwater
pt: Água mineral natural
ru: вода артезианская подготовленная
sv: naturligt källvatten

en: mountain spring water
bg: планинска изворна вода
de: Bergquellwasser, Berg-Quellwasser
fi: vuoristolähdevesi
fr: eau de source de montagne
hr: planinska izvorska voda
it: acqua di sorgente di montagna
nl: bergbronwater
pl: górska woda źródlana

en: carbonated spring water
bg: газирана изворна вода
de: Quellwasser mit Kohlensäure
es: agua de manantial con gas
fr: eau de source gazéifiée, Eau de source avec adjonction de gaz carbonique
hr: gazirana izvorska voda
it: acqua di sorgente gassata
nl: bruisend bronwater
pt: água de nascente gaseificada
sv: kolsyrat källvatten

en: mineral water
af: Mineraalwater
ar: مياه معدنية
az: Mineral su
be: Мінеральная вада
bg: Минерална вода
bo: གཏེར་ཆུ།
br: Dour melar
ca: Aigua mineral
cs: Minerální voda, minerálka
cy: Dŵr mwyn
da: mineralvand
de: Mineralwasser
el: Μεταλλικό νερό
eo: Mineralakvo
es: Agua mineral
et: Mineraalvesi
fa: آب معدنی
fi: kivennäisvesi, mineraalivesi
fr: eau minérale
ga: Uiscí mianraí
gl: Auga mineral
he: מים מינרליים
hi: खनिज जल
hr: mineralna voda
hu: Ásványvíz
hy: Հանքային ջուր
id: Air mineral
it: Acqua minerale
ja: ミネラルウォーター, 鉱泉水, 鉱水
ka: მინერალური წყალი
kk: Минерал су
ky: Минералдуу суулар
lt: Mineralinis vanduo
lv: Minerālūdens
mk: Минерална вода
ms: Air galian
nb: Naturlig mineralvann
nl: Mineraalwater
nn: Mineralvatn
or: ଖଣିଜ ଜଳ
pl: Woda mineralna
ps: کاني اوبه
pt: Água mineral
ro: Apă minerală
ru: Минеральная вода
sc: Aba minerale
sh: Mineralna voda
sk: Minerálna voda
sl: Mineralna voda
sr: Минерална вода
sv: mineralvatten
ta: கனிம நீர்
th: น้ำแร่
tr: Maden suyu
tt: Минераль су
uk: Мінеральні води
uz: Mineral suvlar
vi: Nước khoáng
zh: 礦泉水

en: natural mineral water
bg: натурална минерална вода
da: naturligt mineralvand
de: Natürliches Mineralwasser
es: Agua Mineral natural
fi: luontainen kivennäisvesi, luonnollinen mineraalivesi
fr: eau minérale naturelle
hr: prirodna mineralna voda, negazirana prirodna mineralna voda
hu: természetes szénsavmentes ásványvíz
it: acqua minerale naturale
nl: natuurlijk mineraalwater
pl: naturalna woda mineralna
sv: naturligt mineralvatten

en: Natural mineral water from the Valais Alps
de: Natürliches Mineralwasser aus den Walliser Alpen
fr: Eau minérale naturelle des Alpes Valaisannes
hr: prirodna mineralna voda iz valskih alpa
it: acqua minerale naturale delle Alpi vallesane

en: Volvic natural mineral water
de: Natürliches Mineralwasser Volvic
fr: eau minérale naturelle volvic
hr: prirodna mineralna voda volvic
it: acqua minerale naturale Volvic
nl: Volvic natuurlijk mineraalwater

en: Luchon natural mineral water
de: natürliches Mineralwasser Luchon
fr: Eau minérale naturelle de Luchon
hr: luchon prirodna mineralna voda
it: acqua minerale naturale Luchon

en: carbonated water, sparkling water
af: Sodawater, klubsoda, bruiswater, vonkelwater, seltzerwater
ar: ماء مكربن, ماء غازي
az: Qazlı su
bg: газирана вода
bs: Soda voda
ca: Aigua carbonatada
cs: sodovka, Sodová voda, sifon, sycená, perlivá voda
da: Danskvand
de: Tafelwasser, Sprudelwasser, Wasser mit Kohlensäure
el: σόδα
eo: Karbonata akvo
es: Agua carbonatada
et: Gaseeritud vesi, karboniseeritud vesi, mulliga vesi
fi: soodavesi, hiilihapotettu vesi
fr: Eau gazeuse, eau acidulée, eau effervescente, eau pétillante, eau gazéifiée, soda club, soda nature, eau gazéifié, eau gazéfiée
he: מי סודה
hr: gazirana voda
hu: Szódavíz
id: Air soda, air berkarbonasi
is: Sódavatn, kolsýrt vatn
it: acqua gasata, acqua frizzante
ja: 炭酸水
ka: კარბონატული წყალი
kn: ಇಂಗಾಲಾಮ್ಲಮಿಶ್ರಿತ ನೀರು
ko: 탄산수
lt: Gazuotas vanduo
lv: Gāzēts ūdens
mk: Сода-вода
ml: സോഡാജലം
mr: सोडा
ms: Air berkarbonat, Air bergas, air seltzer, seltzer, air soda
nb: Kullsyreholdig vann
nl: Sodawater, gazeuse, bruiswater, spuitwater, koolzuurhoudend water, sprankelend water
pl: Woda gazowana
pt: Água gaseificada
ro: Sifon, Apa carbonatată, apa gazoasă, sifonul
ru: Газированная вода
si: Sifon, Apa carbonatată, apa gazoasă, sifonul
sr: Сода вода
sv: kolsyrat vatten
ta: சோடா நீர்
th: โซดา
tr: Soda, sodalı su, karbonatlı su
uk: Газована вода, підкислена вода, шипуча вода, содова вода
yi: סאדע וואסער
zh: 碳酸水

en: Carbonated mineral water, sparkling mineral water
de: Mineralwasser mit Kohlensäure, kohlensäurehaltiges Mineralwasser
es: agua mineral carbonatada, agua carbonatada mineral
fi: hiilihapotettu kivennäisvesi
fr: eau minérale gazeuse
hr: gazirana mineralna voda
it: acqua minerale gassata
nl: Bruisend mineraalwater, gashoudendmineraalwater

en: carbonated natural mineral water, natural sparkling mineral water
fi: hiilihapotettu luontainen kivennäisvesi
fr: eau minérale naturelle gazeuse
hr: gazirana prirodna mineralna voda
it: acqua minerale naturale frizzante
nl: gashoudend natuurlijk mineraalwater

fr: eau minérale naturelle gazéifiée, eau minérale naturelle avec adjonction de gaz carbonique
de: Natürliches Mineralwasser mit Kohlensäure versetzt
hr: prirodna mineralna voda s povećanom količinom ugljikovog dioksida iz izvora
it: acqua minerale naturale con aggiunta di anidride carbonica

fr: Eau minérale naturelle de Spa gazéifiée
nl: Koolzuurhoudend Spa natuurlijk mineraalwater

en: naturally carbonated natural mineral water
de: natürliches Mineralwasser mit Kohlensäure
fi: luontaisesti hiilihapotettu luontainen kivennäisvesi
fr: eau minerale naturelle naturellement gazeuse
hr: prirodno gazirana prirodna mineralna voda
it: acqua minerale naturale naturalmente frizzante
nl: natuurlijk gashoudend natuurlijk mineraalwater

en: filtered water, purified water
da: filtreret vand
de: gefiltertes Wasser, gereinigtes Wasser
es: agua filtrada, agua purificada, agua filtrada y purificada
fi: suodatettu vesi, puhdistettu vesi
fr: eau filtrée, eau purifiée
hr: filtrirana voda
hu: szűrt víz, tisztított víz
it: Acqua filtrata
ko: 정제수
nl: gezuiverd water
pl: Woda filtrowana
pt: Água filtrada
ru: Фильтрованная вода
sv: filtrerat vatten

en: cooking water
de: kochendes Wasser
es: agua de cocción
fr: eau de cuisson
hr: voda za kuhanje
it: acqua di cottura
nl: kookwater

en: ice
af: Ys
am: በረዶ
an: Chelo
ar: جليد
ay: Chhullunkhaya
az: Buz
be: лёд
bg: Лед
bn: বরফ
bs: Led
ca: gel
cs: led
cv: Пăр
cy: Iâ
da: is
de: Eis
el: πάγος
eo: glacio
es: hielo
et: Jää
eu: izotz
fa: یخ
fi: jää
fr: glace
ga: Oighear
gd: Dèigh
gl: Xeo
gn: Yrypy'a
ha: Ƙanƙara
he: קרח
hi: बर्फ़
hr: led
ht: Glas
hu: jég
hy: սառույց
ia: Glacie
id: es
ie: Glacie
ik: Siku
io: glacio
is: Ís
it: ghiaccio
ja: 氷
jv: Ès
ka: ყინული
kk: Мұз
ko: 얼음
ky: Муз
la: glacies
li: Ies
ln: Galási
lt: Ledas
lv: ledus
mg: Ranomandry
mk: Мраз
ml: ഐസ്
mn: Мөс
mr: बर्फ
ms: Ais
my: ရေခဲ
nb: is
ne: बरफ
nl: ijs
nn: is
nv: Tin
oc: Glaç
or: ବରଫ
pa: ਬਰਫ਼
pl: lód
pt: gelo
qu: Chullunku
ro: Gheață
ru: лёд
sd: برف
sh: Led
sk: ľad
sl: Led
so: Baraf
sq: Akulli
sr: лед
su: És
sv: is
sw: Barafu
ta: பனி
te: మంచు
tg: Ях
th: น้ำแข็ง
tl: Yelo
tr: Buz
tt: боз
uk: лід
ur: برف
uz: Muz
vi: Băng
wa: Glaece
zh: 冰
zu: Iqhwa

en: soya, soy, soja, soia
an: soya
az: soya
ba: соя
be: соя
bg: соя, соеви, соево, соева
br: soja
bs: soja, sojino
ca: soia, soja
cs: sója, sójové
cv: соя
cy: soia
da: soja
de: Soja
el: σόγια
es: soja, soya
et: soja
eu: soja
fi: soija, soijasta
fr: soja, soya, soia, sojas
ga: soighe
gl: soia
gn: sóha
he: סויה
hr: iz soje, soja, soje, soju, sojino, sojina, sojine
hu: szója, szójatej, szójaliszt, szójából, szóját
ia: soya, soja
id: kedelai
io: soyo
it: soia
ja: ダイズ
jv: dhelé
kk: соя
ku: soya
lt: soja, sojų
lv: soja, sojas
mg: soja
mk: соја
ms: soya
nb: soya
nl: soja
oc: sòja
os: сойæ
pl: soja, soję, soi, sojowy, sojowe, soją, sojowa, sojowego, sojowej, sojowych
pt: soja
qu: suya
ro: soia
ru: соя, соевый, сои
rw: soya
sh: soja
sk: sójové
sl: soja, soje
sr: соја
sv: soja
sw: soya
tr: soya
tt: соя
uk: соя
uz: soya
zh: 黄豆, 大豆类制品